Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201876-3221
Attorney General; duties.

At the request of the board, the Attorney General shall render an opinion with respect to all questions of law arising in connection with the administration of the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act and shall act as attorney for the board in all actions and proceedings brought by or against the board under or pursuant to the act. All fees and expenses of the Attorney General arising out of such duties shall be paid out of the Appraisal Management Company Fund. The Attorney General may appoint special counsel to prosecute such action, and all allowed fees and expenses of such counsel shall be taxed as costs in the action as the court may direct.

Laws 2018, LB17, § 19.
July 19, 2018